src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/V-unimorphstuff_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Verb - ailõ: # Verb 51 'eng /est joosta/fin' - full paradigm
    āibaltõ+V+Inf: āibaltõ
    āibaltõ+V+Ger: āibaltõs
    āibaltõ+V+Sup: āibaltõm
    āibaltõ+V+Sup+Ela: āibaltõmõst
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: āibaltõb
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: āibaltõd
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: āibaltõb
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: āibaltõm
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: āibaltõt
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: āibaltõbõd
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: āibaltiz
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: āibaltizt
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: āibaltiz
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: āibaltizmõ
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [āibaltizt, āibaltiztõ]
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [āibaltizt, āibaltiztõ]
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: āibalt
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: āibaltõm
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: āibaltõt
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: āibaltõt
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: āibaltõks
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: āibaltõkst
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: āibaltõks
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: āibaltõksmõ
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: āibaltõkstõ
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: āibaltõkstõ
    āibaltõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: āibaltõks
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: āibaltõksmõ
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: āibaltõkstõ
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: āibaltõkstõ
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: āibalt
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: āibalt
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: āibaltõgid
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: āibaltõgid
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: āibaltõg
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: āibaltõg
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: āibaltõgõd
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: āibaltõgõd
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: āibaltiji
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: āibaltijid
    āibaltõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: āibaltijid
    āibaltõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: āibaltõn
    āibaltõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: āibaltõnd
    āibaltõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: āibaltõd
    āibaltõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: āibaltõb
    aigõ+V+Inf: aigõ
    aigõ+V+Ger: aigõs
    aigõ+V+Sup: aigõm
    aigõ+V+Sup+Ela: aigõmõst
    aigõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: āigõb
    aigõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: āigõd
    aigõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: āigõb
    aigõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: aigõm
    aigõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: aigõt
    aigõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: aigõbõd
    aigõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: āigiz
    aigõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: āigizt
    aigõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: āigiz
    aigõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: āigizmõ
    aigõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [āigizt, āigiztõ]
    aigõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [āigizt, āigiztõ]
    aigõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: aig
    aigõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: aigõm
    aigõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: aigõt
    aigõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: aigõt
    aigõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: aigõks
    aigõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: aigõkst
    aigõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: aigõks
    aigõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: aigõksmõ
    aigõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: aigõkstõ
    aigõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: aigõkstõ
    aigõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: aigõks
    aigõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: aigõksmõ
    aigõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: aigõkstõ
    aigõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: aigõkstõ
    aigõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: aig
    aigõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: aig
    aigõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: aigõgid
    aigõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: aigõgid
    aigõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: aigõg
    aigõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: aigõg
    aigõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: aigõgõd
    aigõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: aigõgõd
    aigõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: aigiji
    aigõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: aigijid
    aigõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: aigijid
    aigõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: aigõn
    aigõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: aigõnd
    aigõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aigdõd
    aigõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aigdõb
    ailõ+V+Inf: aʼilõ
    ailõ+V+Ger: aʼilõs
    ailõ+V+Sup: aʼilõm
    ailõ+V+Sup+Ela: aʼilõmõst
    ailõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aʼilõb
    ailõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: aʼilõd
    ailõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aʼilõb
    ailõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: aʼilõm
    ailõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: aʼilõt
    ailõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: aʼilõbõd
    ailõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: aʼiliz
    ailõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: aʼilizt
    ailõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: aʼiliz
    ailõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: aʼilizmõ
    ailõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [aʼilizt, aʼiliztõ]
    ailõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [aʼilizt, aʼiliztõ]
    ailõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: aʼil
    ailõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: aʼilõm
    ailõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: aʼilõt
    ailõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: aʼilõt
    ailõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: aʼilõks
    ailõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: aʼilõkst
    ailõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: aʼilõks
    ailõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: aʼilõksmõ
    ailõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: aʼilõkstõ
    ailõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: aʼilõkstõ
    ailõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: aʼilõks
    ailõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: aʼilõksmõ
    ailõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: aʼilõkstõ
    ailõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: aʼilõkstõ
    ailõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: aʼil
    ailõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: aʼil
    ailõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: aʼilõgid
    ailõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: aʼilõgid
    ailõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: aʼilõg
    ailõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: aʼilõg
    ailõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: aʼilõgõd
    ailõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: aʼilõgõd
    ailõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: aʼiliji
    ailõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: aʼilijid
    ailõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: aʼilijid
    ailõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: aʼilõn
    ailõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: aʼilõnd
    ailõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aʼildõd
    ailõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aʼildõb
    airõ+V+Inf: airõ
    airõ+V+Ger: airõs
    airõ+V+Sup: airõm
    airõ+V+Sup+Ela: airõmõst
    airõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: āirõb
    airõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: āirõd
    airõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: āirõb
    airõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: airõm
    airõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: airõt
    airõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: airõbõd
    airõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: āiriz
    airõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: āirizt
    airõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: āiriz
    airõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: āirizmõ
    airõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [āirizt, āiriztõ]
    airõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [āirizt, āiriztõ]
    airõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: air
    airõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: airõm
    airõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: airõt
    airõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: airõt
    airõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: airõks
    airõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: airõkst
    airõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: airõks
    airõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: airõksmõ
    airõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: airõkstõ
    airõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: airõkstõ
    airõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: airõks
    airõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: airõksmõ
    airõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: airõkstõ
    airõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: airõkstõ
    airõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: air
    airõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: air
    airõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: airõgid
    airõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: airõgid
    airõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: airõg
    airõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: airõg
    airõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: airõgõd
    airõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: airõgõd
    airõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: airiji
    airõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: airijid
    airõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: airijid
    airõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: airõn
    airõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: airõnd
    airõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: airdõd
    airõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: airdõb
    ajjõ+V+Inf: aʼjjõ
    ajjõ+V+Ger: aʼjjõs
    ajjõ+V+Sup: ajām
    ajjõ+V+Sup+Ela: ajāmõst
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ajāb
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ajād
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ajāb
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ajām
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ajāt
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ajābõd
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ajīz
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ajīzt
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ajīz
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ajīzmõ
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [ajīzt, ajīztõ]
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [ajīzt, ajīztõ]
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ajā
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: ajām
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: ajāt
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: ajāt
    ajjõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: ajāks
    ajjõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: ajākst
    ajjõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: ajāks
    ajjõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: ajāksmõ
    ajjõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: ajākstõ
    ajjõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: ajākstõ
    ajjõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: ajāks
    ajjõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: ajāksmõ
    ajjõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: ajākstõ
    ajjõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: ajākstõ
    ajjõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: ajā
    ajjõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: ajā
    ajjõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: ajāgid
    ajjõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: ajāgid
    ajjõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: ajāg
    ajjõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: ajāg
    ajjõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: ajāgõd
    ajjõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: ajāgõd
    ajjõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: ajāji
    ajjõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: ajājid
    ajjõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: ajājid
    ajjõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: aʼjjõn
    ajjõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: aʼjjõnd
    ajjõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aʼjtõd
    ajjõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aʼjtõb
    ajjõ+V+Inf: aʼjjõ
    ajjõ+V+Ger: aʼjjõs
    ajjõ+V+Sup: ajām
    ajjõ+V+Sup+Ela: ajāmõst
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ajāb
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ajād
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ajāb
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ajām
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ajāt
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ajābõd
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ajīz
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ajīzt
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ajīz
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ajīzmõ
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [ajīzt, ajīztõ]
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [ajīzt, ajīztõ]
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ajā
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: ajām
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: ajāt
    ajjõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: ajāt
    ajjõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: ajāks
    ajjõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: ajākst
    ajjõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: ajāks
    ajjõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: ajāksmõ
    ajjõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: ajākstõ
    ajjõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: ajākstõ
    ajjõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: ajāks
    ajjõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: ajāksmõ
    ajjõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: ajākstõ
    ajjõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: ajākstõ
    ajjõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: ajā
    ajjõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: ajā
    ajjõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: ajāgid
    ajjõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: ajāgid
    ajjõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: ajāg
    ajjõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: ajāg
    ajjõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: ajāgõd
    ajjõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: ajāgõd
    ajjõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: ajāji
    ajjõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: ajājid
    ajjõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: ajājid
    ajjõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: aʼjjõn
    ajjõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: aʼjjõnd
    ajjõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aʼjtõd
    ajjõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aʼjtõb
    akkõ+V+Inf: akkõ
    akkõ+V+Ger: akkõs
    akkõ+V+Sup: akkõm
    akkõ+V+Sup+Ela: akkõmõst
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: akūb
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: akūd
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: akūb
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: akkõm
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: akkõt
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: akkõbõd
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: akīz
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: akīzt
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: akīz
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: akīzmõ
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [akīzt, akīztõ]
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [akīzt, akīztõ]
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ak
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: akkõm
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: akkõt
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: akkõt
    akkõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: akkõks
    akkõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: akkõkst
    akkõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: akkõks
    akkõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: akkõksmõ
    akkõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: akkõkstõ
    akkõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: akkõkstõ
    akkõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: akkõks
    akkõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: akkõksmõ
    akkõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: akkõkstõ
    akkõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: akkõkstõ
    akkõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: ak
    akkõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: ak
    akkõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: akkõgid
    akkõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: akkõgid
    akkõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: akkõg
    akkõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: akkõg
    akkõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: akkõgõd
    akkõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: akkõgõd
    akkõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: akkiji
    akkõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: akkijid
    akkõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: akkijid
    akkõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: akkõn
    akkõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: akkõnd
    akkõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aktõd
    akkõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: aktõb
    akkõ+V+Inf: akkõ
    akkõ+V+Ger: akkõs
    akkõ+V+Sup: akkõm
    akkõ+V+Sup+Ela: akkõmõst
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: akūb
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: akūd
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: akūb
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: akkõm
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: akkõt
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: akkõbõd
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: akīz
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: akīzt
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: akīz
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: akīzmõ
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [akīzt, akīztõ]
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [akīzt, akīztõ]
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ak
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: akkõm
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: akkõt
    akkõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: akkõt
    akkõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: akkõks
    akkõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: akkõkst
    akkõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: akkõks
    akkõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: akkõksmõ
    akkõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: akkõkstõ
    akkõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: akkõkstõ
